Vermont, session 2025-2026, H368.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4028 is added to read
§ 4028. POSSESSION OF FIREARMS IN GOVERNMENT BUILDINGS
PROHIBITED
(a) A person shall not knowingly possess a firearm in a government
building.
(b) A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned for not more
than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
(c) This section shall not apply to:
VT LEG #378846 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.368
2025 Page 2 of 3
(1) a firearm carried for legitimate law enforcement purposes by a
federal law enforcement officer or a law enforcement officer certified as a law
enforcement officer by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to 20
V.S.A. § 2358; or
(2) a firearm carried by a person while preforming the person’s official
duties as an employee of the United States; a department or agency of the
United States; a state; or a department, agency, or political subdivision of a
state if the person is authorized to carry a firearm as part of the person’s
official duties.
(d) Notice of the provisions of this section shall be posted conspicuously at
each public entrance to each government building.
(e) As used in this section:
(1) “Firearm” has the same meaning as in subsection 4017(d) of this
title.
(2)(A) “Government building” means a building owned, leased, rented,
or operated by the State, a political subdivision of the State, or a municipality.
(B) “Government building” does not include a building owned,
leased, rented, or operated by a municipality, or a portion of such a building, if
the legislative body of the municipality has by resolution or ordinance:
(i) designated the building or portion of the building as a location
where firearms are permitted; or
VT LEG #378846 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.368
2025 Page 3 of 3
(ii) opted out of this section and designated that all buildings
owned, leased, rented, or operated by the municipality are locations where
firearms are permitted.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #378846 v.1